Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 135A.195, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Exemption. Notwithstanding subdivision 1, paragraph (b), this section does not apply to an addendum or amendment to a contract entered into by an institution of higher education on or before July 1, 2023, that increases or decreases the number of managed programs. deleted text begin This subdivision expires July 1, 2028.deleted text end